Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2134SV (2) 91 cm/ns S.F. 503 Section 1. Section 22.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. âGovernment bodyâ means this state, or any county, 3 city, township, school corporation, political subdivision, 4 tax-supported district, or instrumentality of a county, 5 city, or township; a nonprofit corporation other than a fair 6 conducting a fair event as provided in chapter 174 , whose 7 facilities or indebtedness are supported in whole or in part 8 with property tax revenue and which is licensed to conduct 9 pari-mutuel wagering pursuant to chapter 99D ; the governing 10 body of a drainage or levee district as provided in chapter 11 468 , including a board as defined in section 468.3 , regardless 12 of how the district is organized; or other entity of this 13 state, or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, 14 council, committee, official, or officer of any of the 15 foregoing or any employee delegated the responsibility for 16 implementing the requirements of this chapter . 17 Sec. 2. Section 22.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. âInstrumentalityâ means an entity 20 to which all of the following apply: 21 (1) The entity serves a governmental purpose or performs a 22 governmental function. 23 (2) The entity operates on behalf of one or more political 24 subdivisions. 25 (3) One or more political subdivisions have the powers and 26 interests of an owner with respect to the entity. 27 (4) Control and supervision of the entity is vested in 28 members of one or more political subdivisions. 29 b. â Instrumentalityâ includes but is not limited to the 30 following entities: 31 (1) The Iowa league of cities. 32 (2) The Iowa state association of counties. 33 (3) The Iowa stormwater education partnership. 34 c. âInstrumentalityâ does not include a state, county, 35 -1- LSB 2134SV (2) 91 cm/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 503 or city insurance group entity or an employee benefits group 1 entity. 2